Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
150A

PLANT AND
NON-DOMESTIC ANIMAL QUARANTINE

AND
MICROORGANISM IMPORT

Part I. General Provisions

Section

150A-1 Short title

150A-2 Definitions

150A-3 Delegation of duties

150A-4 Effect on department of land and natural
resources and

the department of health

150A-4.5 Pest inspection, quarantine, and
eradication fund

Part II. Regulation of Importation

150A-5 Conditions of importation

150A-5.3 Inspection, quarantine, and eradication
service fee

and charge

150A-5.4 Failure to pay or remit the inspection,
quarantine,

and eradication service fee; fines

150A-5.5 What constitutes importation

150A-5.6 Exceptions to the right to import

150A-6 Soil, plants, animals, etc., importation
or possession

prohibited

150A-6.1 Plant import

150A-6.2 Animal import

150A-6.3 Microorganism import

150A-6.4 Permit and other import document issuance;
requirements

150A-6.5 Animals; prohibition against possession,
etc.;

exception

150A-6.6 Import lists amendment

150A-6.7 Repealed

150A-7 Disposition

150A-7.5 User fees

150A-7.6 Processing fees for importation and
possession

requests

150A-8 Transporting in State

150A-9 Rules and regulations

150A-9.5 Interim rules

150A-10 Advisory committee on plants and animals

150A-11 Enforcement

150A-11.5 Entry of private property for enforcement

150A-12 Citation and summons

150A-13 Administration of oath

150A-14 Penalty

150A-15 Failure to obey summons

Part III. Nursery Stock Export Shipments

150A-21 Certification for shipment

150A-22 Responsibility for treatment

150A-23 Nursery stock certificate

Part IV. Other Exports

150A-31 Certificate for shipment

Part V. Certified Importers of Microorganisms

150A-41 Microorganism import

150A-42 Certificate

150A-43 Suspension or revocation of certificate

150A-44 Summary suspension

150A-45 Emergency remediation

150A-46 Conditions of importation under
certification

150A-47 Penalties

150A-48 Repealed

Part VI. Biosecurity Program

150A-51 Biosecurity program; establishment

150A-52 Objectives of biosecurity program

150A-53 General actions to achieve objectives

150A-54 Biosecurity program; charges; costs

150A-55 Federal and other funds

150A-56 Schedule of appropriations and
expenditures for program

150A-57 Annual report

Note

L 2010, c 173, §13 provides:

L 2010, c 173, §13 provides:

"SECTION 13. (a) Between July 1, 2010, and
September 30, 2010, the department of agriculture shall adopt new or amend
existing rules to impose or increase the fees authorized to be charged under
chapter 150A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, without regard to the public notice and
public hearing requirements of section 91-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the small
business impact review requirements of chapter 201M, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
or the limit on fee increases under section 92-28, Hawaii Revised
Statutes. The department shall set the fees at amounts intended to
generate, together with the inspection, quarantine, and eradication service
fee, sufficient revenues to pay the operation and maintenance costs of
implementing the agriculture inspection and biosecurity programs of chapter
150A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and the central services and departmental
administrative expense assessments of section 36-27 and section 36-30, Hawaii
Revised Statutes.

(b) If, by September 30, 2010, the department of
agriculture has not complied with subsection (a), then the fee charged for each
inspection or certification conducted under authority of chapter 150A shall be
as follows, effective October 1, 2010:

(1) A fee for
inspection, safeguarding, witnessing departure, witnessing treatment, or
certification requiring the services of personnel beyond regular work hours,
including pre-shift, post-shift, holidays, or days off shall be $50 plus
mileage reimbursement, and an additional fee shall be assessed, which shall
include applicable charges for overtime wages, fixed charges for personnel
services, and meals;

(2) A fee for
any inspection during regular work hours conducted away from the port or
department office that is conducted pursuant to requirements for export,
certification, inter-island or intra-island movement, or disposition other than
release at a port of arrival, such as witnessing departure, destruction, or
treatment, shall be $50 per hour plus mileage reimbursement;

(3) An annual
fee for nursery certification shall be $100;

(4) A fee for
follow-up inspections required to correct deficiencies found in a certification
inspection or inspections to remedy out-of-state rejections shall be $50 per
hour plus mileage reimbursement;

(5) A fee for
treatment or destruction of infested commodities performed by the department's
plant quarantine branch shall be $50 per parcel;

(6) A fee for
the use of a quarantine house operated by the department's plant quarantine
branch shall be $50 per room per month; and

(7) A storage
fee of $5 per day shall be charged for commodities stored at any department
plant quarantine branch office, forty-eight hours after written notification.

The fee shall be deposited into the pest inspection,
quarantine, and eradication fund.

(c) Any subsequent amendments to the rules adopted or
amended pursuant to subsection (a) or the fees established under subsection (b)
shall be subject to all applicable provisions of chapter 91, chapter 201M, and
section 92-28, Hawaii Revised Statutes."

Invasive species management requirements, including
interisland and export database for agricultural commodities. L 2016, c 243,
§§3, 6.

Plant quarantine branch, financial and performance audit;
report to 2017 legislature. L 2016, c 243, §7.

Cross References

Coqui frog; designation as pest, see §141-3.

Invasive species council, see chapter 194.

Landowners liability for access to control invasive species,
see chapter 520A.

Quarantine of domestic animals, see chapter 142, part I.

Attorney General Opinions

Department of agriculture has responsibility to keep State
free of imported agricultural pests, and may receive gifts to assist in
preventing entry of brown tree snakes into State. Att. Gen. Op. 92-4.

Case Notes

While this chapter and the board's microorganism import rules
may have vested the board with exclusive authority to approve marine
biotechnology firm's proposal to import and grow genetically engineered algae
at the State's research and technology park, as the demonstration project
constituted an action that proposed the use of state land, §343-5 plainly and
unambiguously required the preparation of an environmental assessment before
the board could approve firm's application. 118 H. 247 (App.), 188 P.3d 761.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next